test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON N49	
+N49:uenö	Cases ;
+N49:ufld	Cases ;
+N49:uuåd	Cases ;
+N49:uegi	Cases ;
+N49:uyår	Cases ;
+N49:uwkl	Cases ;
+N49:uptu	Cases ;
+N49:uäeå	Cases ;
+N49:uebg	Cases ;
+N49:ubjq	Cases ;
+N49:uiax	Cases ;
+N49:uöfl	Cases ;
+N49:ucaq	Cases ;
+N49:utbz	Cases ;
+N49:ufmw	Cases ;
+N49:upzc	Cases ;
+N49:uodf	Cases ;
+N49:ujxw	Cases ;
+N49:ulta	Cases ;
+N49:uqff	Cases ;
+N49:udtr	Cases ;
+N49:ubpc	Cases ;
+N49:uäåå	Cases ;
+N49:uzad	Cases ;
+N49:utxv	Cases ;
+N49:upål	Cases ;
+N49:usdx	Cases ;
+N49:uqtö	Cases ;
+N49:umäi	Cases ;
+N49:urwy	Cases ;
+N49:ubmx	Cases ;
+N49:uvag	Cases ;
+N49:uieo	Cases ;
+N49:uuco	Cases ;
+N49:ukip	Cases ;
+N49:urvä	Cases ;
+N49:upil	Cases ;
+N49:uålw	Cases ;
+N49:uäcä	Cases ;
+N49:uöbä	Cases ;
+N49:uoab	Cases ;
+N49:undu	Cases ;
+N49:ugyr	Cases ;
+N49:uhöa	Cases ;
+N49:uzuc	Cases ;
+N49:uätz	Cases ;
+N49:ugdw	Cases ;
+N49:urgy	Cases ;
+N49:ujwd	Cases ;
+N49:ucfr	Cases ;
+N49:urbs	Cases ;
+N49:ufko	Cases ;
+N49:ubcy	Cases ;
+N49:ugkp	Cases ;
+N49:utqu	Cases ;
+N49:uiök	Cases ;
+N49:uiöf	Cases ;
+N49:unyd	Cases ;
+N49:uiuå	Cases ;
+N49:uqöv	Cases ;
+N49:uxcx	Cases ;
+N49:uivz	Cases ;
+N49:uoäv	Cases ;
+N49:uggj	Cases ;
+N49:upär	Cases ;
+N49:uötb	Cases ;
+N49:uqbi	Cases ;
+N49:uawå	Cases ;
+N49:uwzj	Cases ;
+N49:uvxx	Cases ;
+N49:ucvs	Cases ;
+N49:uwmw	Cases ;
+N49:uzgs	Cases ;
+N49:uöjn	Cases ;
+N49:uhpd	Cases ;
+N49:uoög	Cases ;
+N49:umpu	Cases ;
+N49:uåox	Cases ;
+N49:ulöm	Cases ;
+N49:upbx	Cases ;
+N49:uokc	Cases ;
+N49:ubsa	Cases ;
+N49:ueos	Cases ;
+N49:ujzå	Cases ;
+N49:unwå	Cases ;
+N49:urpu	Cases ;
+N49:uckb	Cases ;
+N49:uopb	Cases ;
+N49:uanå	Cases ;
+N49:uäåy	Cases ;
+N49:unbi	Cases ;
+N49:utxa	Cases ;
+N49:udno	Cases ;
+N49:uråq	Cases ;
+N49:uäwp	Cases ;
+N49:ulyt	Cases ;
+N49:uigz	Cases ;
+N49:utog	Cases ;
+N49:uaha	Cases ;


LEXICON N50	
+N5%0:vjkk	Cases ;
+N5%0:vqov	Cases ;
+N5%0:vdrw	Cases ;
+N5%0:vsiö	Cases ;
+N5%0:väöt	Cases ;
+N5%0:vffu	Cases ;
+N5%0:vzpa	Cases ;
+N5%0:våfr	Cases ;
+N5%0:vwgw	Cases ;
+N5%0:vdwd	Cases ;
+N5%0:vgåe	Cases ;
+N5%0:vvöm	Cases ;
+N5%0:vjtc	Cases ;
+N5%0:vthv	Cases ;
+N5%0:vapl	Cases ;
+N5%0:vral	Cases ;
+N5%0:vajm	Cases ;
+N5%0:vbar	Cases ;
+N5%0:våök	Cases ;
+N5%0:vapz	Cases ;
+N5%0:voea	Cases ;
+N5%0:vuma	Cases ;
+N5%0:vtzk	Cases ;
+N5%0:vlkh	Cases ;
+N5%0:vvyr	Cases ;
+N5%0:vvae	Cases ;
+N5%0:vatå	Cases ;
+N5%0:vykb	Cases ;
+N5%0:vlöf	Cases ;
+N5%0:väåz	Cases ;
+N5%0:vcha	Cases ;
+N5%0:vruk	Cases ;
+N5%0:vwuv	Cases ;
+N5%0:vmav	Cases ;
+N5%0:vkag	Cases ;
+N5%0:vpqw	Cases ;
+N5%0:vrxu	Cases ;
+N5%0:veök	Cases ;
+N5%0:vvul	Cases ;
+N5%0:vssn	Cases ;
+N5%0:vrrd	Cases ;
+N5%0:vryh	Cases ;
+N5%0:vcbm	Cases ;
+N5%0:vqzc	Cases ;
+N5%0:vfhm	Cases ;
+N5%0:vatå	Cases ;
+N5%0:vrvi	Cases ;
+N5%0:vjöu	Cases ;
+N5%0:vqpy	Cases ;
+N5%0:vmuk	Cases ;
+N5%0:vnaö	Cases ;
+N5%0:vsqj	Cases ;
+N5%0:vwef	Cases ;
+N5%0:venl	Cases ;
+N5%0:vkol	Cases ;
+N5%0:vcxk	Cases ;
+N5%0:väpb	Cases ;
+N5%0:vbyj	Cases ;
+N5%0:vlzk	Cases ;
+N5%0:vajj	Cases ;
+N5%0:våmm	Cases ;
+N5%0:vsvt	Cases ;
+N5%0:vmqg	Cases ;
+N5%0:vqab	Cases ;
+N5%0:vzav	Cases ;
+N5%0:voca	Cases ;
+N5%0:vquf	Cases ;
+N5%0:vvqä	Cases ;
+N5%0:vcnv	Cases ;
+N5%0:vykq	Cases ;
+N5%0:vbbn	Cases ;
+N5%0:voög	Cases ;
+N5%0:vjhp	Cases ;
+N5%0:vqvz	Cases ;
+N5%0:vgis	Cases ;
+N5%0:vjlj	Cases ;
+N5%0:vwvv	Cases ;
+N5%0:vhfå	Cases ;
+N5%0:vuåf	Cases ;
+N5%0:vznö	Cases ;
+N5%0:vmtå	Cases ;
+N5%0:vtcx	Cases ;
+N5%0:vkåö	Cases ;
+N5%0:vqkä	Cases ;
+N5%0:vguå	Cases ;
+N5%0:vaqa	Cases ;
+N5%0:vgvi	Cases ;
+N5%0:vivv	Cases ;
+N5%0:vqcn	Cases ;
+N5%0:vwhi	Cases ;
+N5%0:vixz	Cases ;
+N5%0:vala	Cases ;
+N5%0:vdqg	Cases ;
+N5%0:viäc	Cases ;
+N5%0:vjgw	Cases ;
+N5%0:vcdw	Cases ;
+N5%0:vxry	Cases ;
+N5%0:vmäd	Cases ;
+N5%0:väne	Cases ;


LEXICON V51	
+V51:wsvn	Modes ;
+V51:wuäl	Modes ;
+V51:wokm	Modes ;
+V51:wyeg	Modes ;
+V51:wqdx	Modes ;
+V51:wsäi	Modes ;
+V51:wrjb	Modes ;
+V51:wllj	Modes ;
+V51:wmnä	Modes ;
+V51:wfzk	Modes ;
+V51:wgäö	Modes ;
+V51:weåy	Modes ;
+V51:wjfe	Modes ;
+V51:wsaä	Modes ;
+V51:wlyy	Modes ;
+V51:wvys	Modes ;
+V51:wmjt	Modes ;
+V51:weäv	Modes ;
+V51:wkåo	Modes ;
+V51:wojj	Modes ;
+V51:wdln	Modes ;
+V51:wgwf	Modes ;
+V51:wåij	Modes ;
+V51:wdbq	Modes ;
+V51:wgzö	Modes ;
+V51:wvrr	Modes ;
+V51:wdoh	Modes ;
+V51:wymp	Modes ;
+V51:wlvi	Modes ;
+V51:wjnz	Modes ;
+V51:wåvg	Modes ;
+V51:wxok	Modes ;
+V51:whäi	Modes ;
+V51:wmtn	Modes ;
+V51:wcbä	Modes ;
+V51:wöra	Modes ;
+V51:wvzä	Modes ;
+V51:wnln	Modes ;
+V51:wöla	Modes ;
+V51:wlcg	Modes ;
+V51:wåhj	Modes ;
+V51:wsyg	Modes ;
+V51:wlär	Modes ;
+V51:wvdg	Modes ;
+V51:wnmw	Modes ;
+V51:woxc	Modes ;
+V51:wxeq	Modes ;
+V51:wsro	Modes ;
+V51:wggj	Modes ;
+V51:wixy	Modes ;
+V51:wöko	Modes ;
+V51:wpev	Modes ;
+V51:wtji	Modes ;
+V51:wzqs	Modes ;
+V51:wvkä	Modes ;
+V51:wrby	Modes ;
+V51:wlvq	Modes ;
+V51:wgcl	Modes ;
+V51:wbwc	Modes ;
+V51:wcds	Modes ;
+V51:whzk	Modes ;
+V51:wbem	Modes ;
+V51:wquä	Modes ;
+V51:wjog	Modes ;
+V51:wfäu	Modes ;
+V51:wszr	Modes ;
+V51:wwae	Modes ;
+V51:wigö	Modes ;
+V51:wdkp	Modes ;
+V51:weig	Modes ;
+V51:whgb	Modes ;
+V51:whib	Modes ;
+V51:wwyä	Modes ;
+V51:wyru	Modes ;
+V51:wdso	Modes ;
+V51:wxpc	Modes ;
+V51:wval	Modes ;
+V51:wora	Modes ;
+V51:wbtb	Modes ;
+V51:weiz	Modes ;
+V51:wåbn	Modes ;
+V51:wssz	Modes ;
+V51:wiee	Modes ;
+V51:wkcv	Modes ;
+V51:wodz	Modes ;
+V51:wåäc	Modes ;
+V51:wrgv	Modes ;
+V51:wpnm	Modes ;
+V51:wmdi	Modes ;
+V51:wydl	Modes ;
+V51:wwgv	Modes ;
+V51:woyc	Modes ;
+V51:wwof	Modes ;
+V51:wgaö	Modes ;
+V51:wvkd	Modes ;
+V51:wföå	Modes ;
+V51:wiko	Modes ;
+V51:wesc	Modes ;
+V51:weäa	Modes ;


LEXICON V52	
+V52:xzpe	Modes ;
+V52:xhwq	Modes ;
+V52:xfhp	Modes ;
+V52:xksi	Modes ;
+V52:xkeq	Modes ;
+V52:xyhn	Modes ;
+V52:xtwj	Modes ;
+V52:xyvn	Modes ;
+V52:xuöe	Modes ;
+V52:xäuh	Modes ;
+V52:xptä	Modes ;
+V52:xyhp	Modes ;
+V52:xnlc	Modes ;
+V52:xxnu	Modes ;
+V52:xöcl	Modes ;
+V52:xclb	Modes ;
+V52:xåfu	Modes ;
+V52:xrkö	Modes ;
+V52:xoaa	Modes ;
+V52:xjåk	Modes ;
+V52:xacf	Modes ;
+V52:xtbr	Modes ;
+V52:xilg	Modes ;
+V52:xzhz	Modes ;
+V52:xzöi	Modes ;
+V52:xcfm	Modes ;
+V52:xnpn	Modes ;
+V52:xhom	Modes ;
+V52:xxåc	Modes ;
+V52:xwjh	Modes ;
+V52:xjhf	Modes ;
+V52:xkdb	Modes ;
+V52:xyog	Modes ;
+V52:xckk	Modes ;
+V52:xptp	Modes ;
+V52:xxrc	Modes ;
+V52:xcew	Modes ;
+V52:xjvh	Modes ;
+V52:xgmv	Modes ;
+V52:xhjq	Modes ;
+V52:xowö	Modes ;
+V52:xzxq	Modes ;
+V52:xehn	Modes ;
+V52:xnle	Modes ;
+V52:xöyp	Modes ;
+V52:xyåm	Modes ;
+V52:xidl	Modes ;
+V52:xjla	Modes ;
+V52:xgiu	Modes ;
+V52:xans	Modes ;
+V52:xrwi	Modes ;
+V52:xerä	Modes ;
+V52:xejt	Modes ;
+V52:xjrö	Modes ;
+V52:xxsw	Modes ;
+V52:xamr	Modes ;
+V52:xlxf	Modes ;
+V52:xgwd	Modes ;
+V52:xluq	Modes ;
+V52:xtiv	Modes ;
+V52:xkwp	Modes ;
+V52:xråm	Modes ;
+V52:xgeb	Modes ;
+V52:xqhx	Modes ;
+V52:xckm	Modes ;
+V52:xdub	Modes ;
+V52:xkåj	Modes ;
+V52:xåny	Modes ;
+V52:xgcn	Modes ;
+V52:xsti	Modes ;
+V52:xmyv	Modes ;
+V52:xgez	Modes ;
+V52:xmåj	Modes ;
+V52:xoxk	Modes ;
+V52:xtog	Modes ;
+V52:xovu	Modes ;
+V52:xrdp	Modes ;
+V52:xfqå	Modes ;
+V52:xxos	Modes ;
+V52:xvvh	Modes ;
+V52:xxwi	Modes ;
+V52:xudi	Modes ;
+V52:xanä	Modes ;
+V52:xkba	Modes ;
+V52:xzmo	Modes ;
+V52:xxmx	Modes ;
+V52:xrkq	Modes ;
+V52:xiwy	Modes ;
+V52:xduk	Modes ;
+V52:xvxb	Modes ;
+V52:xahc	Modes ;
+V52:xgäp	Modes ;
+V52:xpam	Modes ;
+V52:xmlo	Modes ;
+V52:xnåö	Modes ;
+V52:xaym	Modes ;
+V52:xdät	Modes ;
+V52:xxbs	Modes ;
+V52:xtvk	Modes ;

LEXICON Root
u N49 ;
v N50 ;
w V51 ;
x V52 ;
